Florida, session 2026, HB7003.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (q) of subsection (2) of section
119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
119.071 General exemptions from inspection or copying of
public records.—
(2) AGENCY INVESTIGATIONS.—
(q)1. As used in this paragraph, the term:
a. "Conviction integrity unit" means a unit within a state
attorney's office established for the purpose of reviewing
plausible claims of actual innocence.
b. "Conviction integrity unit reinvestigation information"
means information or materials generated during a new
investigation by a conviction integrity unit following the
unit's formal written acceptance of an applicant's case. The
term does not include:
(I) Information, materials, or records generated by a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7003-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 7003 2026
state attorney's office during an investigation done for the
purpose of responding to motions made pursuant to Rule 3.800,
Rule 3.850, or Rule 3.853, Florida Rules of Criminal Procedure,
or any other collateral proceeding.
(II) Petitions by applicants to the conviction integrity
unit.
(III) Criminal investigative information generated before
the commencement of a conviction integrity unit investigation
which is not otherwise exempt from this section.
2. Conviction integrity unit reinvestigation information
is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Constitution for a reasonable period of time during an active,
ongoing, and good faith investigation of a claim of actual
innocence in a case that previously resulted in the conviction
of the accused person and until the claim is no longer capable
of further investigation. This paragraph is subject to the Open
Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and
shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and
saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb7003-00